Connecticut, session 2026, HB05543.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 9-704 of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
2 is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
3 December 1, 2026):
4 (a) The amount of qualifying contributions that the candidate
5 committee of a candidate shall be required to receive in order to be
6 eligible for grants from the Citizens' Election Fund shall be:
7 (1) In the case of a candidate for nomination or election to the office
8 of Governor, contributions from individuals in the aggregate amount of
9 [two hundred fifty thousand] two hundred eighty-eight thousand eight
10 hundred dollars, of which [two hundred twenty-five thousand] two
11 hundred fifty-nine thousand nine hundred dollars or more is
12 contributed by individuals residing in the state. [, except that in the case
HB5543 / File No. 523 1

HB5543 File No. 523
13 of a primary or election held in 2022, or thereafter, the aggregate
14 contribution amounts shall be first adjusted under subdivision (1) of
15 subsection (b) of this section and then rounded to the nearest multiple
16 of one hundred dollars with exactly fifty dollars rounded upward.] The
17 provisions of this subdivision shall be subject to the following: (A)
18 Except as provided in subparagraph (C) of this subdivision and
19 subsection (g) of section 9-610, (i) on and after January 1, 2019, the
20 candidate committee shall return the portion of any contribution or
21 contributions from any individual, including said candidate, that
22 exceeds two hundred fifty dollars, and (ii) any such excess portion shall
23 not be considered in calculating the aggregate contribution amounts
24 under this subdivision, (B) all contributions received by (i) an
25 exploratory committee established by said candidate, or (ii) an
26 exploratory committee or candidate committee of a candidate for the
27 office of Lieutenant Governor who is deemed to be jointly campaigning
28 with a candidate for nomination or election to the office of Governor
29 under subsection (a) of section 9-709, which meet the criteria for
30 qualifying contributions to candidate committees under this section
31 shall be considered in calculating the aggregate contribution amounts,
32 and (C) in the case of a primary or election held in 2022, or thereafter,
33 the two-hundred-fifty-dollar maximum individual contribution amount
34 provided in subparagraph (A) of this subdivision shall be first adjusted
35 under subdivision (1) of subsection [(c)] (b) of this section and then
36 rounded to the nearest multiple of ten dollars with exactly five dollars
37 rounded upward.
38 (2) In the case of a candidate for nomination or election to the office
39 of Lieutenant Governor, Attorney General, State Comptroller, State
40 Treasurer or Secretary of the State, contributions from individuals in the
41 aggregate amount of [seventy-five thousand] eighty-six thousand six
42 hundred dollars, of which [sixty-seven thousand five hundred] seventy-
43 eight thousand dollars or more is contributed by individuals residing in
44 the state. [, except that in the case of a primary or election for Lieutenant
45 Governor held in 2022, or thereafter, the aggregate contribution
46 amounts shall be first adjusted under subdivision (1) of subsection (b)
47 of this section and then rounded to the nearest multiple of one hundred
HB5543 / File No. 523 2

HB5543 File No. 523
48 dollars with exactly fifty dollars rounded upward and in the case of a
49 primary or election for Attorney General, State Comptroller, State
50 Treasurer or Secretary of the State held in 2018, or thereafter, the
51 aggregate contribution amounts shall be first adjusted under
52 subdivision (2) of subsection (b) of this section and then rounded to the
53 nearest multiple of one hundred dollars with exactly fifty dollars
54 rounded upward.] The provisions of this subdivision shall be subject to
55 the following: (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (C) of this
56 subdivision and subsection (g) of section 9-610, (i) on and after January
57 1, 2019, the candidate committee shall return the portion of any
58 contribution or contributions from any individual, including said
59 candidate, that exceeds two hundred fifty dollars, and (ii) any such
60 excess portion shall not be considered in calculating the aggregate
61 contribution amounts under this subdivision, (B) all contributions
62 received by an exploratory committee established by said candidate that
63 meet the criteria for qualifying contributions to candidate committees
64 under this section shall be considered in calculating the aggregate
65 contribution amounts, and (C) in the case of a primary or election held
66 in 2022, or thereafter, the two-hundred-fifty-dollar maximum
67 individual contribution amount provided in subparagraph (A) of this
68 subdivision shall be first adjusted under subdivision (1) of subsection
69 [(c)] (b) of this section and then rounded to the nearest multiple of ten
70 dollars with exactly five dollars rounded upward.
71 (3) In the case of a candidate for nomination or election to the office
72 of state senator for a district, contributions from individuals in the
73 aggregate amount of [fifteen thousand] seventeen thousand three
74 hundred dollars, including contributions from at least three hundred
75 individuals residing in municipalities included, in whole or in part, in
76 said district. [, except that in the case of a primary or election held in
77 2018, or thereafter, the aggregate contribution amount shall be first
78 adjusted under subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section and then
79 rounded to the nearest multiple of one hundred dollars with exactly fifty
80 dollars rounded upward.] The provisions of this subdivision shall be
81 subject to the following: (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (D) of
82 this subdivision and subsection (g) of section 9-610, (i) on and after
HB5543 / File No. 523 3

HB5543 File No. 523
83 December 1, 2017, the candidate committee shall return the portion of
84 any contribution or contributions from any individual, including said
85 candidate, that exceeds two hundred fifty dollars, and (ii) any such
86 excess portion shall not be considered in calculating the aggregate
87 contribution amount under this subdivision, (B) no contribution shall be
88 counted for the purposes of the requirement under this subdivision for
89 contributions from at least three hundred individuals residing in
90 municipalities included, in whole or in part, in the district unless the
91 contribution is five dollars or more, [and] (C) all contributions received
92 by an exploratory committee established by said candidate that meet the
93 criteria for qualifying contributions to candidate committees under this
94 section shall be considered in calculating the aggregate contribution
95 amount under this subdivision and all such exploratory committee
96 contributions that also meet the requirement under this subdivision for
97 contributions from at least three hundred individuals residing in
98 municipalities included, in whole or in part, in the district shall be
99 counted for the purposes of said requirement, and (D) in the case of a
100 primary or election held in 2020, or thereafter, the two-hundred-fifty-
101 dollar maximum individual contribution amount provided in
102 subparagraph (A) of this subdivision shall be adjusted under
103 subdivision (2) of subsection [(c)] (b) of this section and then rounded to
104 the nearest multiple of ten dollars with exactly five dollars rounded
105 upward.
106 (4) In the case of a candidate for nomination or election to the office
107 of state representative for a district, contributions from individuals in
108 the aggregate amount of [five thousand] five thousand eight hundred
109 dollars, including contributions from at least one hundred fifty
110 individuals residing in municipalities included, in whole or in part, in
111 said district. [, except that in the case of a primary or election held in
112 2018, or thereafter, the aggregate contribution amount shall be first
113 adjusted under subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section and then
114 rounded to the nearest multiple of one hundred dollars with exactly fifty
115 dollars rounded upward.] The provisions of this subdivision shall be
116 subject to the following: (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (D) of
117 this subdivision and subsection (g) of section 9-610, (i) on and after
HB5543 / File No. 523 4

HB5543 File No. 523
118 December 1, 2017, the candidate committee shall return the portion of
119 any contribution or contributions from any individual, including said
120 candidate, that exceeds two hundred fifty dollars, and (ii) any such
121 excess portion shall not be considered in calculating the aggregate
122 contribution amount under this subdivision, (B) no contribution shall be
123 counted for the purposes of the requirement under this subdivision for
124 contributions from at least one hundred fifty individuals residing in
125 municipalities included, in whole or in part, in the district unless the
126 contribution is five dollars or more, (C) all contributions received by an
127 exploratory committee established by said candidate that meet the
128 criteria for qualifying contributions to candidate committees under this
129 section shall be considered in calculating the aggregate contribution
130 amount under this subdivision and all such exploratory committee
131 contributions that also meet the requirement under this subdivision for
132 contributions from at least one hundred fifty individuals residing in
133 municipalities included, in whole or in part, in the district shall be
134 counted for the purposes of said requirement, and (D) in the case of a
135 primary or election held in 2020, or thereafter, the two-hundred-fifty-
136 dollar maximum individual contribution amount provided in
137 subparagraph (A) of this subdivision shall be adjusted under
138 subdivision (2) of subsection [(c)] (b) of this section and then rounded to
139 the nearest multiple of ten dollars with exactly five dollars rounded
140 upward.
141 (5) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivisions (3) and (4) of this
142 subsection, in the case of a special election for the office of state senator
143 or state representative for a district, (A) the aggregate amount of
144 qualifying contributions that the candidate committee of a candidate for
145 such office shall be required to receive in order to be eligible for a grant
146 from the Citizens' Election Fund shall be seventy-five per cent or more
147 of the corresponding amount required under the applicable said
148 subdivision (3) or (4), [as adjusted and rounded pursuant to the
149 applicable provisions of subsection (b) of this section,] and (B) the
150 number of contributions required from individuals residing in
151 municipalities included, in whole or in part, in said district shall be
152 seventy-five per cent or more of the corresponding number required
HB5543 / File No. 523 5

HB5543 File No. 523
153 under the applicable said subdivision (3) or (4).
154 [(b) (1) (A) For elections for the office of Governor or Lieutenant
155 Governor held in 2026, the aggregate contribution amounts in
156 subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection (a) of this section, as applicable, shall
157 be adjusted by the State Elections Enforcement Commission not later
158 than January 15, 2026, in accordance with any change in the consumer
159 price index for all urban consumers as published by the United States
160 Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, during the period
161 beginning on January 1, 2017, and ending on December thirty-first in the
162 year preceding the year in which said adjustment is to be made.
163 (B) For elections for the office of Governor or Lieutenant Governor
164 held in 2030, and thereafter, the aggregate contribution amounts in
165 subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection (a) of this section, as applicable, shall
166 be adjusted by the State Elections Enforcement Commission not later
167 than December 15, 2026, and quadrennially thereafter, in accordance
168 with any change in the consumer price index for all urban consumers as
169 published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor
170 Statistics, during the period beginning on December 1, 2016, and ending
171 on November thirtieth in the year in which said adjustment is to be
172 made.
173 (2) (A) For elections for the office of Attorney General, State
174 Comptroller, State Treasurer or Secretary of the State held in 2026, the
175 aggregate contribution amounts in subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of
176 this section shall be adjusted by the State Elections Enforcement
177 Commission not later than January 15, 2026, in accordance with any
178 change in the consumer price index for all urban consumers as
179 published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor
180 Statistics, during the period beginning on January 1, 2017, and ending
181 on December thirty-first in the year preceding the year in which said
182 adjustment is to be made.
183 (B) For elections for the office of Attorney General, State Comptroller,
184 State Treasurer or Secretary of the State held in 2030, and thereafter, the
185 aggregate contribution amounts in subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of
HB5543 / File No. 523 6

HB5543 File No. 523
186 this section shall be adjusted by the State Elections Enforcement
187 Commission not later than December 15, 2026, and quadrennially
188 thereafter, in accordance with any change in the consumer price index
189 for all urban consumers as published by the United States Department
190 of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, during the period beginning on
191 December 1, 2016, and ending on November thirtieth in the year in
192 which said adjustment is to be made.
193 (3) (A) For elections for the office of state senator or state
194 representative held in 2018, and thereafter until December 31, 2025, the
195 aggregate contribution amounts in subdivision (3) or (4) of subsection
196 (a) of this section, as applicable, shall be adjusted by the State Elections
197 Enforcement Commission not later than January 15, 2018, and biennially
198 thereafter until December 31, 2025, in accordance with any change in the
199 consumer price index for all urban consumers as published by the
200 United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, during
201 the period beginning on January 1, 2017, and ending on December
202 thirty-first in the year preceding the year in which said adjustment is to
203 be made.
204 (B) For elections for the office of state senator or state representative
205 held in 2026, and thereafter, the aggregate contribution amounts in
206 subdivision (3) or (4) of subsection (a) of this section, as applicable, shall
207 be adjusted by the State Elections Enforcement Commission not later
208 than December 15, 2025, and biennially thereafter, in accordance with
209 any change in the consumer price index for all urban consumers as
210 published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor
211 Statistics, during the period beginning on December 1, 2016, and ending
212 on November thirtieth in the year in which said adjustment is to be
213 made.]
214 [(c) (1) (A) Subject to the provisions of subdivision (3) of this
215 subsection, for elections for the office of Governor, Lieutenant
216 Governor, Attorney General, State Comptroller, State Treasurer or
217 Secretary of the State held in 2026, the two-hundred-fifty-dollar
218 maximum individual contribution amount in subdivision (1) or (2) of
HB5543 / File No. 523 7

HB5543 File No. 523
219 subsection (a) of this section, as applicable, shall be adjusted by the State
220 Elections Enforcement Commission not later than January 15, 2026, in
221 accordance with any change in the consumer price index for all urban
222 consumers as published by the United States Department of Labor,
223 Bureau of Labor Statistics, during the period beginning on January 1,
224 2017, and ending on December thirty-first in the year preceding the year
225 in which said adjustment is to be made.]
226 [(B)] (b) (1) Subject to the provisions of subdivision (3) of this
227 subsection, for elections for the office of Governor, Lieutenant
228 Governor, Attorney General, State Comptroller, State Treasurer or
229 Secretary of the State held in 2030, and thereafter, the two-hundred-
230 fifty-dollar maximum individual contribution amount in subdivision (1)
231 or (2) of subsection (a) of this section, as applicable, shall be adjusted by
232 the State Elections Enforcement Commission not later than December
233 15, 2026, and quadrennially thereafter, in accordance with any change
234 in the consumer price index for all urban consumers as published by the
235 United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, during
236 the period beginning on December 1, 2016, and ending on November
237 thirtieth in the year in which said adjustment is to be made.
238 [(2) (A) Subject to the provisions of subdivision (3) of this subsection,
239 for elections for the office of state senator or state representative held in
240 2020, and thereafter until December 31, 2025, the two-hundred-fifty-
241 dollar maximum individual contribution amount in subdivision (3) or
242 (4) of subsection (a) of this section, as applicable, shall be adjusted by
243 the State Elections Enforcement Commission not later than January 15,
244 2020, and biennially thereafter until December 31, 2025, in accordance
245 with any change in the consumer price index for all urban consumers as
246 published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor
247 Statistics, during the period beginning on January 1, 2017, and ending
248 on December thirty-first in the year preceding the year in which said
249 adjustment is to be made.]
250 [(B)] (2) Subject to the provisions of subdivision (3) of this subsection,
251 for elections for the office of state senator or state representative held in
HB5543 / File No. 523 8

HB5543 File No. 523
252 [2026] 2028, and thereafter, the two-hundred-fifty-dollar maximum
253 individual contribution amount in subdivision (3) or (4) of subsection
254 (a) of this section, as applicable, shall be adjusted by the State Elections
255 Enforcement Commission not later than December 15, [2025] 2026, and
256 biennially thereafter, in accordance with any change in the consumer
257 price index for all urban consumers as published by the United States
258 Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, during the period
259 beginning on December 1, 2016, and ending on November thirtieth in
260 the year in which said adjustment is to be made.
261 (3) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this subdivision, on
262 and after December 15, 2025, the maximum individual contribution
263 amount resulting from any adjustment made by the State Elections
264 Enforcement Commission, pursuant to subdivision (1) or (2) of this
265 subsection, as applicable, shall remain in effect until the immediately
266 following adjustment is made by the commission, at which time a new
267 maximum individual contribution amount shall take effect.
268 (B) In the event that any adjustment made by the State Elections
269 Enforcement Commission, pursuant to subdivision (1) or (2) of this
270 subsection, as applicable, results in a new maximum individual
271 contribution amount that would be less than the maximum individual
272 contribution amount that resulted from the immediately preceding
273 adjustment, (i) such new maximum individual contribution amount
274 shall not take effect, and (ii) the maximum individual contribution
275 amount that resulted from the immediately preceding adjustment shall
276 remain in effect until the next adjustment made by the commission
277 pursuant to subdivision (1) or (2) of this subsection, as applicable.
278 [(d)] (c) Each individual who makes a contribution of more than fifty
279 dollars to a candidate committee established to aid or promote the
280 success of a participating candidate for nomination or election shall
281 include with the contribution a certification that contains the same
282 information described in subdivision (3) of subsection (c) of section 9-
283 608 and shall follow the same procedure prescribed in said subsection.
284 [(e)] (d) (1) The following shall not be deemed to be qualifying
HB5543 / File No. 523 9

HB5543 File No. 523
285 contributions under subsection (a) of this section and shall be returned
286 to the contributor by the treasurer of the candidate committee in
287 accordance with the provisions of subdivision (2) of subsection (d) of
288 section 9-706 or donated to a charitable organization which is a tax-
289 exempt organization under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue
290 Code of 1986, or any subsequent corresponding internal revenue code
291 of the United States, as amended from time to time:
292 (A) A contribution from a principal of a state contractor or
293 prospective state contractor;
294 (B) A contribution of less than five dollars;
295 (C) A contribution under subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection (a) of
296 this section from an individual who does not reside in the state, in excess
297 of the applicable limit on contributions from out-of-state individuals in
298 subsection (a) of this section; and
299 (D) A contribution made by a youth who is less than twelve years of
300 age.
301 (2) A contribution of five dollars or more from an individual who
302 does not provide the full name and complete address of such individual
303 shall not be deemed to be a qualifying contribution under subsection (a)
304 of this section and shall be returned to the contributor by the treasurer
305 of the candidate committee, if practicable, or transmitted to the State
306 Elections Enforcement Commission for deposit in the Citizens' Election
307 Fund.
308 [(f)] (e) After a candidate committee receives the applicable aggregate
309 amount of qualifying contributions under subsection (a) of this section,
310 the candidate committee shall transmit any additional contributions
311 that it receives to the State Treasurer for deposit in the Citizens' Election
312 Fund.
313 [(g)] (f) As used in this section, "principal of a state contractor or
314 prospective state contractor" has the same meaning as provided in
315 subsection (g) of section 9-612, and "individual" shall include sole
HB5543 / File No. 523 10

HB5543 File No. 523
316 proprietorships.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 December 1, 2026 9-704
GAE Joint Favorable
HB5543 / File No. 523 11

HB5543 File No. 523
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Resources of the Citizens' CEF - Cost See Below See Below
Election Fund
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill adjusts the aggregate contribution amounts to qualify for
grants under the Citizens' Election Program (CEP) at the 2022 level and
eliminates the inflationary adjustment for aggregate contribution
amounts following the 2026 election cycle, resulting in a cost to the
resources of the Citizens' Election Fund (CEF) beginning in FY 27. This
cost is associated with the lower qualification threshold for CEP
funding, enabling more candidates to access it. The exact cost will
depend on the number of additional candidates who qualify for the
program and the value of the grants issued.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to inflation, the number of additional
qualified applicants, and the value of the grants issued.
HB5543 / File No. 523 12

HB5543 File No. 523
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5543
AN ACT CONCERNING CERTAIN REVISIONS TO AGGREGATE
AND INDIVIDUAL CONTRIBUTION AMOUNTS UNDER THE
CITIZENS' ELECTION PROGRAM.